en: CD/DVD Duplicators
xx: CD/DVD Duplicators
cs: Duplikátory disků CD/DVD
da: Cd-/dvd-duplikatorer
de: CD-/DVD-Brenner
es: Torres duplicadoras CD/DVD
fr: Graveurs de CD/DVD
it: Duplicatori per CD/DVD
ja: CD・DVDデュプリケーター
nl: Cd/dvd-branders
no: CD/DVD-duplikatorer
pl: Duplikatory CD/DVD
pt: Gravadores de CD/DVD
ru: Дупликаторы CD/DVD-дисков
sv: CD/DVD-duplicerare
tr: CD/DVD Çoğaltıcılar

en: Hard Drive Duplicators
xx: Hard Drive Duplicators
cs: Duplikátory pevných disků
da: Harddiskduplikatorer
de: Festplatten-Duplizierer
es: Duplicadoras de disco duro
fr: Duplicateurs de disque dur
it: Duplicatori disco rigido
ja: HDDデュプリケーター
nl: Vasteschijfduplicators
no: Harddiskduplikatorer
pl: Duplikatory dysków twardych
pt: Duplicadores de disco rígido
ru: Дупликаторы жестких дисков
sv: Hårddiskduplicerare
tr: Sabit Sürücü Çoğaltıcılar

en: USB Drive Duplicators
xx: USB Drive Duplicators
cs: Duplikátory jednotek USB
da: USB-drevduplikatorer
de: USB-Laufwerk-Duplizierer
es: Duplicadoras de unidades USB
fr: Duplicateurs de clés USB
it: Duplicatori unità USB
ja: USBドライブデュプリケーター
nl: USB-stationduplicators
no: USB-duplikatorer
pl: Duplikatory dysków USB
pt: Duplicadores de unidades USB
ru: Дупликаторы USB-накопителей
sv: Duplicerare för USB-enheter
tr: USB Sürücü Çoğaltıcılar

en: Floppy Drives
xx: Floppy Drives
cs: Disketové jednotky
da: Diskettedrev
de: Diskettenlaufwerke
es: Disqueteras
fr: Lecteurs de disquettes
it: Unità floppy
ja: フロッピードライブ
nl: Diskettestations
no: Diskettstasjoner
pl: Napędy dyskietek
pt: Unidades de disquete
ru: Дисководы для гибких дисков
sv: Diskettstationer
tr: Disket Sürücüler

en: Hard Drive Accessories
xx: Hard Drive Accessories
cs: Pevné disky – příslušenství
da: Lagringsdrev – tilbehør
de: Festplattenzubehör
es: Accesorios para discos duros
fr: Accessoires pour disques durs
it: Accessori per dischi rigidi
ja: ストレージデバイス関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor harde schijven
no: Tilbehør til harddisker
pl: Akcesoria do dysków twardych
pt: Acessórios para unidades de armazenamento
ru: Принадлежности для дисковых накопителей
sv: Tillbehör till lagringsenheter
tr: Sabit Sürücü Aksesuarları

en: Hard Drive Carrying Cases
xx: Hard Drive Carrying Cases
cs: Pouzdra na přenosné pevné disky
da: Harddisk – bæretasker
de: Festplatten-Transporttaschen
es: Maletines para discos duros
fr: Mallettes de transport pour disques durs
it: Custodie trasporto dischi rigidi
ja: HDDキャリーケース
nl: Draagtassen voor harde schijven
no: Bæreetuier for harddisker
pl: Futerały na dyski twarde
pt: Estojos de transporte para disco rígido
ru: Футляры для переноски жестких дисков
sv: Väskor för hårddiskar
tr: Sabit Sürücü Taşıma Kılıfları

en: Hard Drive Docks
xx: Hard Drive Docks
cs: Dokovací jednotky pro pevné disky
da: Harddisk – dokke
de: Festplatten-Dockingstationen
es: Bases de conexión de discos duros
fr: Stations d'accueil pour disques durs
it: Dock per disco rigido
ja: HDDドック
nl: Docks voor vaste schijven
no: Harddiskdokker
pl: Stacje dokujące dysków twardych
pt: Suportes para disco rígido
ru: Док-станции для жестких дисков
sv: Hårddiskchassin
tr: Sabit Sürücü Yuvaları

en: Hard Drive Enclosures & Mounts
xx: Hard Drive Enclosures & Mounts
cs: Rámečky a montážní prvky k pevným diskům
da: Harddiskkabinetter og -beslag
de: Festplattengehäuse & -steckplätze
es: Soportes y carcasas para discos duros
fr: Boîtiers et fixations pour disques durs
it: Supporti e contenitori per dischi rigidi
ja: HDDケース・マウント
nl: Behuizingen en frames voor harde schijven
no: Harddiskomslutninger og -stativer
pl: Obudowy i mocowania do dysków twardych
pt: Suportes e estruturas para disco rígido
ru: Футляры и док-станции для жестких дисков
sv: Chassin och monteringssatser för hårddiskar
tr: Sabit Sürücü Kılıfları ve Yuvaları

en: Hard Drive Arrays
xx: Hard Drive Arrays
cs: Disková pole
da: Diskenheder
de: Disk-Arrays
es: Matrices de disco duro
fr: Baies de stockage
it: Matrici dischi
ja: ディスクアレイ
nl: Schijfarrays
no: Harddiskmatriser
pl: Macierze dyskowe
pt: Arrays de disco
ru: Дисковые массивы
sv: Hårddiskklustrar
tr: Sabit Sürücü Dizileri

en: Hard Drives
xx: Hard Drives
cs: Pevné disky
da: Harddiske
de: Festplatten
es: Discos duros
fr: Disques durs
it: Dischi rigidi
ja: HDD
nl: Vaste schijven
no: Harddisker
pl: Dyski twarde
pt: Discos rígidos
ru: Жесткие диски
sv: Hårddiskar
tr: Sabit Sürücüler

en: External hard drive
fr: Disque dur externe

en: Network Storage Systems
xx: Network Storage Systems
cs: Systémy síťových úložišť
da: Systemer til netværkslagring
de: Netzwerkspeichersysteme
es: Sistemas de almacenamiento de red
fr: Systèmes de stockage en réseau
it: Sistemi di archiviazione di rete
ja: ネットワークストレージシステム
nl: Netwerkopslagsystemen
no: Systemer for nettverkslagring
pl: Sieciowe systemy pamięci
pt: Sistemas de armazenamento de rede
ru: Сетевые системы хранения данных
sv: Nätverkslagringssystem
tr: Ağ Depolama Sistemleri

en: Optical Drives
xx: Optical Drives
cs: Optické jednotky
da: Optiske drev
de: Optische Laufwerke
es: Unidades de disco óptico
fr: Lecteurs optiques
it: Unità ottiche
ja: 光学ドライブ
nl: Optische stations
no: Optiske stasjoner
pl: Napędy optyczne
pt: Drives ópticos
ru: Оптические дисководы
sv: Optiska enheter
tr: Optik Sürücüler

en: Tape Drives
xx: Tape Drives
cs: Páskové jednotky
da: Bånddrev
de: Bandlaufwerke
es: Unidades de cintas magnéticas
fr: Lecteurs de bande
it: Unità nastro
ja: テープドライブ
nl: Tapestations
no: Båndstasjoner
pl: Napędy taśmowe
pt: Drives de fita
ru: Ленточные накопители
sv: Bandenheter
tr: Teyp Sürücüleri

en: USB Flash Drives, USB key
xx: USB Flash Drives
cs: USB flash disky
da: USB-flashdrev, USB-nøgle
de: USB-Massenspeicher
es: Memorias USB
fr: Clés USB, Clef usb, Clé USB
it: Unità flash USB
ja: USBフラッシュドライブ
nl: USB-flashstations
no: USB-flashstasjoner
pl: Dyski USB Flash
pt: Flash Drives USB
ru: USB флэш-накопители
sv: USB-minnen
tr: USB Flash Diskler

en: Tablet Computer Parts
xx: Tablet Computer Parts
cs: Díly pro tablety
da: Reservedele til tablets
de: Tablet-PC-Ersatzteile
es: Piezas de repuesto para tablets
fr: Pièces pour tablettes PC
it: Ricambi per tablet
ja: タブレットPC用パーツ
nl: Onderdelen voor tablets
no: Deler til nettbrett
pl: Części do tabletów
pt: Peças para tablets
ru: Детали для планшетных ПК
sv: Reservdelar till surfplattor
tr: Tablet Bilgisayar Parçaları

en: Tablet Computer Housings & Trim
xx: Tablet Computer Housings & Trim
cs: Náhradní kryty a rámečky pro tablety
da: Kabinetter til tablets
de: Tablet-Gehäuse & -Rahmen
es: Embellecedores y carcasas para tablets
fr: Cadres et pièces de boîtier pour tablettes PC
it: Custodie e rivestimenti per tablet
ja: タブレット PCケース・カバー
nl: Behuizingen en shells voor tablets
no: Deksel og trim for nettbrett
pl: Obudowy tabletów
pt: Equipamentos e carcaças para computadores tablets
ru: Чехлы для планшетных ПК
sv: Chassin och komponenter för surfplattor
tr: Tablet Bilgisayar Kasaları ve Çerçeveleri

en: Tablet Computer Replacement Speakers
xx: Tablet Computer Replacement Speakers
cs: Náhradní reproduktory pro tablety
da: Integrerbare højttalere til tablets
de: Tablet-Ersatzlautsprecher
es: Altavoces de repuesto para tablets
fr: Enceintes de rechange pour tablettes PC
it: Altoparlanti sostituitivi per tablet
ja: タブレットPC用スピーカー
nl: Vervangende luidsprekers voor tablets
no: Reservehøyttalere til nettbrett
pl: Zapasowe głośniki do tabletów
pt: Alto-falantes de reposição para tablet
ru: Сменные динамики для планшетных ПК
sv: Ersättningshögtalare till surfplattor
tr: Tablet Bilgisayar Yedek Hoparlörleri

en: Tablet Computer Screens & Screen Digitizers
xx: Tablet Computer Screens & Screen Digitizers
cs: Displeje a digitalizátory tabletů
da: Skærme og digitizere til tablets
de: Tablet-Bildschirme und Bildschirm-Digitizer
es: Digitalizadores de pantalla y pantallas para tablets
fr: Écrans et numériseurs pour tablettes
it: Schermi e digitalizzatori per tablet
ja: タブレット PC 用スクリーン/スクリーン デジタイザー
nl: Schermen en schermdigitizers voor tabletcomputers
no: Skjermer og digitaliseringsbord for nettbrett
pl: Monitory i digitizery do tabletów
pt: Telas e digitalizadores de telas para tablet
ru: Экраны для планшетных ПК
sv: Skärmar och digitizer för surfplattor
tr: Tablet Bilgisayar Ekranları ve Ekranı

en: USB & FireWire Hubs
xx: USB & FireWire Hubs
cs: Rozbočovače USB a FireWire
da: USB- og FireWire-hubber
de: USB- & FireWire-Hubs
es: Concentradores USB/FireWire
fr: Concentrateurs USB et FireWire
it: Hub USB e FireWire
ja: USBハブ・Firewireハブ
nl: USB- en FireWire-hubs
no: USB- og FireWire-huber
pl: Huby USB i FireWire
pt: Hubs USB e FireWire
ru: Концентраторы USB и FireWire
sv: USB- och FireWire-hubbar
tr: USB ve FireWire Hublar